fr: Classe de taille de lame: Intermédiaire; Junior; Sénior; Enfant; Autre
de: Größenklasse der Klingenlänge: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Sonstige
da: Klingestørrelsesklasse: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Andet
fi: Terän kokoluokka: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Muu
ja: ブレードの寸法クラス: インターメディエイト; ジュニア; シニア; ユース; その他
en: Blade size class: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Other
th: คลาสขนาดใบดาบ: ระดับกลาง; จูเนียร์; ซีเนียร์; เด็ก; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Клас на размера на острието: За младежи; За юноши; За възрастни; За деца; Други
hu: Penge méretosztálya: Intermediate; Junior; Felnőtt; Gyerek; Egyéb
lt-LT: Ašmenų dydžio klasė: Tarpinis („Intermediate“); Jaunių („Junior“); Suaugusiųjų („Senior“); Vaikų („Youth“); Kita
sl-SI: Razred velikosti rezila: Srednje (intermediate); Mladinsko; Člansko; Otroško; Drugo
pt-PT: Classe de tamanho da lâmina: Intermédio; Júnior; Sénior; Juvenil; Outros
el: Κλάση μεγέθους λεπίδας: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Άλλο
it: Classe di dimensioni della lama: Intermedio; Junior; Senior; Youth; Altro
es: Clase de tamaño de la cuchilla: Intermedia; Júnior; Sénior; Juvenil; Otro
sv: Skenstorlek klass: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Övrigt
nb: Bladstørrelsesklasse: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Barn; Annet
ko: 블레이드 크기 등급: 인터미디어트; 주니어; 시니어; 유스; 기타
pt-BR: Classe de tamanho da lâmina: Intermediário; Júnior; Sênior; Infantil; Outro
tr: Bıçak boyutu sınıfı: Ara boy; Genç; Yetişkin; Çocuk; Diğer
pl: Klasa rozmiaru łopatki: Złoty środek (Intermediate); Junior; Senior; Dziecięca; Inna
zh-CN: 剑条尺寸等级: 中级; 青少年; 成人; 青年; 其他
hr-HR: Klasa veličine oštrice: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Dječji (youth); Ostalo
ro-RO: Clasa dimensională a lamei: Intermediar; Junior; Senior; Tineret; Altele
cs: Třída velikosti čepele: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Jiné
sk-SK: Trieda veľkosti čepele: Stredná kategória; Junior; Senior; Mládež; Iné
nl: Blad maat klasse: Intermediate; Junior; Senior; Youth; Anders
ru: Класс размера лезвия: Подростковый (Intermediate); Юниорский (Junior); Взрослый (Senior); Детский (Youth); Другое
zh-TW: 刀片尺寸等級: 中童; 青少年; 成人; 青年; 其他
vi: Phân loại kích thước lưỡi: Trung cấp; Thiếu niên; Người lớn; Trẻ em; Khác